Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXI Agriculture and Animals
Swine

257.600.
Regulations on feeding of untreated garbage to swine —- Permit — Inspections.

The Department of Agriculture shall promulgate regulations governing the feeding of garbage to swine. The department may conduct such inspections as are required to enforce this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 286, § 1, effective April 2, 1982; 2009, ch. 22, § 19, effective June 25, 2009.